Maryland, session 2026, HB1553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
13–705.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1553*

HOUSE BILL 1553
(a) On petition and after any notice or hearing prescribed by law or the Maryland
Rules, a court may appoint a guardian of the person of a disabled person.
(b) A guardian of the person shall be appointed if the court determines from clear
and convincing evidence that:
(1) A person lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make or
communicate responsible personal decisions, including provisions for health care, food,
clothing, or shelter, because of any mental disability, disease, habitual drunkenness, or
addiction to drugs; and
(2) No less restrictive form of intervention is available that is consistent
with the person’s welfare and safety.
(c) (1) Procedures and venue in these cases shall be as described by Title 10,
Chapters 100 and 200 of the Maryland Rules.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection, a
petition for guardianship of a disabled person shall include signed and verified certificates
of competency from the following health care professionals who have examined or evaluated
the disabled person:
(i) Two licensed physicians; or
(ii) 1. One licensed physician; and
2. A. One licensed psychologist;
B. One licensed certified social worker–clinical; or
C. One nurse practitioner.
(3) An examination or evaluation by at least one of the health care
professionals under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall occur within 21 days before filing
a petition for guardianship of a disabled person.
(d) (1) (i) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, unless the alleged
disabled person has counsel of the person’s own choice, the court shall appoint an attorney
to represent the person in the proceeding and may require the deposit of an appropriate
sum into the court registry or the appointed attorney’s escrow account within 30 days after
the order of appointment has been entered, subject to further order of the court.
(ii) If the person is indigent, the State shall pay a reasonable
attorney’s fee.
(iii) The court may not require the deposit of an appropriate sum into
the court registry or the appointed attorney’s escrow account under subparagraph (i) of this

HOUSE BILL 1553 3
paragraph if payment for the services of the court–appointed attorney for the alleged
disabled person is the responsibility of:
1. A government agency paying benefits to the disabled
person;
2. A local department of social services; or
3. An agency eligible to serve as the guardian of the disabled
person under § 13–707 of this subtitle.
(2) In any action in which payment for the services of a court–appointed
attorney for the alleged disabled person is the responsibility of the local department of
social services, unless the court finds that it would not be in the best interests of the alleged
disabled person, the court shall:
(i) Appoint an attorney who has contracted with the Department of
Human Services to provide those services, in accordance with the terms of the contract; and
(ii) In an action in which an attorney has previously been appointed,
strike the appearance of the attorney previously appointed and appoint the attorney who
is currently under contract with the Department of Human Services, in accordance with
the terms of the contract.
(e) (1) (i) The person alleged to be disabled is entitled to be present at the
hearing unless the person has knowingly and voluntarily waived the right to be present or
cannot be present because of physical or mental incapacity.
(ii) Waiver or incapacity may not be presumed from nonappearance
but shall be determined on the basis of factual information supplied to the court by counsel
or a representative appointed by the court.
(2) The person alleged to be disabled is also entitled to present evidence
and to cross–examine witnesses.
(3) The issue may be determined at a closed hearing without a jury if the
person alleged to be disabled or the person’s counsel so requests and all hearings herein
shall be confidential and sealed unless otherwise ordered by a court of competent
jurisdiction for good cause shown.
(f) The court shall hear and rule on a petition seeking appointment of a guardian
of the person of a disabled person in connection with medical treatment on an expedited
basis.
(G) (1) THERE IS A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT IT IS IN THE BEST
INTERESTS OF A DISABLED PERSON THAT AN ORDER APPOINTING A GUARDIAN
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE AN ACCESS SCHEDULE FOR INDIVIDUALS

HOUSE BILL 1553
RELATED TO THE DISABLED PERSON BY BLOOD OR MARRIAGE TO ACCESS THE
DISABLED PERSON.
(2) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT IT IS IN THE BEST INTERESTS
OF THE DISABLED PERSON, AN ORDER APPOINTING A GUARDIAN UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL INCLUDE AN ACCESS SCHEDULE FOR INDIVIDUALS RELATED TO THE
DISABLED PERSON BY BLOOD OR MARRIAGE TO ACCESS THE DISABLED PERSON.
13–708.
(a) (1) The court may grant to a guardian of a person only those powers
necessary to provide for the demonstrated need of the disabled person.
(2) (i) The court may appoint a guardian of the person of a disabled
person for the limited purpose of making one or more decisions related to the health care
of that person.
(ii) The court may appoint a guardian of the person of a disabled
person for a limited period of time if it appears probable that the disability will cease within
1 year of the appointment of the guardian.
(b) Subject to subsection (a) of this section, the rights, duties, and powers that the
court may order include, but are not limited to:
(1) The same rights, powers, and duties that a parent has with respect to
an unemancipated minor child, except that the guardian is not liable solely by reason of the
guardianship to third persons for any act of the disabled person;
(2) The right to custody of the disabled person and to establish the disabled
person’s place of abode within and without the State, provided there is court authorization
for any change in the classification of abode, except that, except as provided under §
10–611 of the Health – General Article, no one may be committed to a mental facility
without an involuntary commitment proceeding as provided by law;
(3) The duty to provide for care, comfort, and maintenance, including
social, recreational, and friendship requirements, and, if appropriate, for training and
education of the disabled person;
(4) If it is in the best interest of the disabled person, the duty to foster and
preserve family relationships including, as appropriate, assisting to arrange visitation and
communication by telephone calls, personal mail, and electronic communications AND TO
COMPLY WITH AN ACCESS SCHEDULE ISSUED BY THE COURT UNDER §
13–705 OF THIS SUBTITLE;

HOUSE BILL 1553 5
(5) The duty to take reasonable care of the clothing, furniture, vehicles, and
other personal effects of the disabled person, and, if other property requires protection, the
power to commence protective proceedings;
(6) If a guardian of the estate of the disabled person has not been
appointed, the right to commence proceedings to compel performance by any person of the
person’s duty to support the disabled person, and to apply the estate to the support, care,
and education of the disabled person, except that the guardian of the person may not obtain
funds from the estate for room and board that the guardian, the guardian’s spouse, parent,
or child provide without a court order approving the charge, and the duty to exercise care
to conserve any excess estate for the needs of the disabled person;
(7) If a guardian of the estate has been appointed, the duty to control the
custody and care of the disabled person, to receive reasonable sums for room and board
provided to the disabled person, and to account to the guardian of the estate for funds
expended, and the right to ask the guardian of the estate to expend the estate in payment
of third persons for care and maintenance of the disabled person;
(8) (i) The duty to file an annual or biannual report with the court
indicating the present place of residence and health status of the ward, the guardian’s plan
for preserving and maintaining the future well–being of the ward, and the need for
continuance or cessation of the guardianship or for any alteration in the powers of the
guardian; and
(ii) On receipt of a report under item (i) of this item:
1. The court shall renew the appointment of the guardian if
the court is satisfied that the grounds for the original appointment stated in § 13–705(b) of
this subtitle continue to exist;
2. If the court believes such grounds may not exist, the court
shall hold a hearing, similar to that provided for in § 13–705 of this subtitle, at which the
guardian shall be required to prove that such grounds exist;
3. If the court does not make these findings, the court shall
order the discontinuance of the guardianship of the person; and
4. If the guardian declines to participate in the hearing, the
court may appoint another guardian to replace the guardian pursuant to the priorities in §
13–707(a) of this subtitle; and
(9) The power to give necessary consent or approval for:
(i) Medical or other professional care, counsel, treatment, or service,
including admission to a hospital or nursing home or transfer from one medical facility to
another;

HOUSE BILL 1553
(ii) Withholding medical or other professional care, counsel,
treatment, or service; and
(iii) Withdrawing medical or other professional care, counsel,
treatment, or service.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding the powers conferred to a guardian under subsection
(b)(8) of this section, and except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, where a
medical procedure involves, or would involve, a substantial risk to the life of a disabled
person, the court must authorize a guardian’s consent or approval for:
(i) The medical procedure;
(ii) Withholding the medical procedure; or
(iii) Withdrawing the medical procedure that involves, or would
involve, a substantial risk to the life of the disabled person.
(2) The court may, upon such conditions as the court considers appropriate,
authorize a guardian to make a decision regarding medical procedures that involve a
substantial risk to life without further court authorization, if:
(i) The disabled person has executed an advance directive in
accordance with Title 5, Subtitle 6 of the Health – General Article that authorizes the
guardian to consent to the provision, withholding or withdrawal of a medical procedure
that involves a substantial risk to life but does not appoint a health care agent; or
(ii) The guardian is:
1. Within a class of individuals specified in § 5–605(a)(2) of
the Health – General Article as authorized to make health care decisions for the disabled
person; and
2. Determined by the court to be familiar with the personal
beliefs, values, and medical situation of the disabled person.
(3) A petition seeking the authorization of a court that a life–sustaining
procedure be withheld or withdrawn is subject to the provisions of §§ 13–711 through
13–713 of this subtitle.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, and in addition to the
rights, duties, and powers which the court may order under subsection (b) of this section,
the court may order the relief provided under this subsection.
(2) (i) If a guardian of the estate has been appointed, a guardian of the
person may ask the guardian of the estate to expend the estate in payment of care and

HOUSE BILL 1553 7
maintenance services provided directly to the disabled person by the guardian of the person
at the rate of reimbursement established under this subsection.
(ii) The guardian of the person shall maintain appropriate records to
document the care and maintenance services provided directly to the disabled person to
receive any payment under this subsection.
(3) To implement the provisions of this subsection, the court may:
(i) Adopt guidelines for the rate of reimbursement for care and
maintenance services provided directly by the guardian of the person to a disabled person;
(ii) Establish appropriate procedures for records, inspections, audits,
or other requirements to monitor care and maintenance services provided directly by the
guardian of the person for which the guardian of the person is reimbursed; and
(iii) Order any act necessary for the best interests of the disabled
person.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, and in addition to the rights,
duties, and powers that the court may order under subsection (b) of this section, the court
may order the guardian of a person with a disability to serve as a victim’s representative
to assert the person’s interests if:
(1) There is no victim’s representative who can adequately assert the
person’s rights as a victim of a crime or a delinquent act; and
(2) No court has appointed a guardian ad litem to protect the person’s
interests.
(F) AN INTERESTED PERSON MAY FILE A PETITION FOR EMERGENCY OR
TEMPORARY GUARDIANSHIP FOR A DISABLED PERSON ON THE BELIEF THAT A
DISABLED PERSON’S CURRENT GUARDIAN IS MEDICALLY OR PHYSICALLY
NEGLECTING THE DISABLED PERSON, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 13–709 AND
13–709.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
13–709.
(a) (1) A law enforcement officer shall transport an adult to an appropriate
medical facility, which shall immediately notify the next of kin and the director, when, from
personal observation of the officer, it appears probable that:
(i) The adult will suffer immediate and serious physical injury or
death if not immediately placed in a health care facility;
(ii) The adult is incapable of giving consent; and

HOUSE BILL 1553
(iii) It is not possible to follow the procedures of this section.
(2) The medical care provided under paragraph (1) of this subsection may
not be rendered in a State mental facility other than, in an appropriate case, the Walter P.
Carter Community Mental Health and Retardation Center and the Highland Health
Facility unless authorized by the courts in a civil commitment proceeding.
(3) (i) The director shall file a petition for any adult transferred under
this subsection pursuant to subsection (b) of this section within 24 hours after the transfer
of the person has taken place.
(ii) The court shall hold a hearing on the petition and render its
decision within 48 hours after the transfer has occurred.
(b) Upon petition by an interested person, a court may issue an order authorizing
the provision of protective services on an emergency basis to an adult after finding on the
record, based on [clear and convincing] A PREPONDERANCE OF THE evidence, that:
(1) For the purpose of this section the person lacks capacity under the
standards enumerated in § 13–705(b) of this subtitle;
(2) (I) An emergency exists, as defined in § 13–101 of this title; OR
(II) THE PERSON IS ALREADY IN A GUARDIANSHIP AND IS BEING
MEDICALLY OR PHYSICALLY NEGLECTED; and
(3) [No] UNLESS THE BASIS OF THE EMERGENCY PETITION IS THAT
THE PERSON IS BEING NEGLECTED BY THE CURRENT GUARDIAN OF THE PERSON, NO
person authorized by law or court order to give consent for the person is available to consent
to emergency services.
(C) A PETITION FILED BY AN INTERESTED PERSON UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE HEARD AND RULED ON WITHIN 1 BUSINESS DAY AFTER THE FILING OF THE
PETITION.
[(c)] (D) In issuing an emergency order, the court shall adhere to the following
limitations:
(1) Only such protective services as are necessary to remove the conditions
creating the emergency shall be ordered; the court shall specifically designate the approved
services in its order;
(2) Protective services authorized by an emergency order shall not include
hospitalization or a change of residence unless the court specifically finds such action is
necessary and gives specific approval for such action in its order;

HOUSE BILL 1553 9
(3) Protective services may be provided under an initial emergency order
for not more than 144 hours, and the initial order may be renewed as provided in paragraph
(5) of this subsection;
(4) In its order the court shall appoint the petitioner, another interested
person, the director, or the Secretary of Aging as [temporary] EMERGENCY guardian of
the person with responsibility for the person’s welfare and authority to give consent for the
person for the approved protective services until the expiration of the order;
(5) (i) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (3) and (4) of this
subsection, the court may extend the terms of the emergency order and the appointment of
the [temporary] EMERGENCY guardian until appointment of a guardian of the person
pursuant to § 13–705 of this subtitle OR THE APPOINTMENT OF A TEMPORARY
GUARDIAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–709.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, on petition of the
[temporary] EMERGENCY guardian, the director, or the Secretary of Aging, as appropriate,
and after a showing that the conditions found to exist in subsection (b) of this section will
probably continue beyond the expiration of the extended emergency order;
(ii) A petition under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be filed
before the expiration of the 6–day period provided for in paragraph (3) of this subsection
and shall be accompanied by a petition for appointment of a guardian of the person
pursuant to § 13–705 of this subtitle; and
(iii) A petition for appointment of a guardian of the person under
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph shall be heard on an expedited basis no more than 60
days after the filing of the petition;
(6) The issuance of an emergency order and the appointment of [a
temporary] AN EMERGENCY guardian shall not deprive the person of any rights except to
the extent provided for in the order or appointment; [and]
(7) (i) To implement an emergency order, the court may authorize
forcible entry of the premises of the person for the purpose of rendering protective services
or transporting the person to another location for the provision of protective services only
after a showing to the court that attempts to gain voluntary access to the premises have
failed and forcible entry is necessary; and
(ii) Persons making authorized forcible entry under subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph shall be accompanied by a law enforcement officer, the director or the
director’s representative, and if appropriate, a representative of the local department of
health; AND
(8) (I) THERE IS A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT IT IS IN THE
BEST INTERESTS OF A DISABLED PERSON THAT AN ORDER APPOINTING A GUARDIAN
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE AN ACCESS SCHEDULE FOR INDIVIDUALS

HOUSE BILL 1553
RELATED TO THE DISABLED PERSON BY BLOOD OR MARRIAGE TO ACCESS THE
DISABLED PERSON; AND
(II) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT IT IS IN THE BEST
INTERESTS OF THE DISABLED PERSON, AN ORDER APPOINTING AN EMERGENCY
GUARDIAN UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE AN ACCESS SCHEDULE FOR
INDIVIDUALS RELATED TO THE DISABLED PERSON BY BLOOD OR MARRIAGE TO
ACCESS THE DISABLED PERSON.
[(d)] (E) The petition for an emergency order shall set forth:
(1) The name, address, and interest of the petitioner;
(2) The name, age, and address of the person in need of protective services;
(3) IF APPLICABLE, THE NAME, AGE, AND ADDRESS OF THE PERSON’S
CURRENT GUARDIAN;
(4) The nature of the person’s disability, if determinable;
[(4)] (5) The proposed protective services;
[(5)] (6) The petitioner’s reasonable belief, together with supportive facts,
as to the existence of the facts stated in subsection (b)(1) through (3) of this section; [and]
[(6)] (7) [Facts] IF APPLICABLE, FACTS showing the petitioner’s
attempts to obtain the person’s consent to the services and the outcomes of the attempts;
AND
(8) IF APPLICABLE, FACTS SHOWING THAT THE PERSON’S CURRENT
GUARDIAN IS MEDICALLY OR PHYSICALLY NEGLECTING THE PERSON.
[(e)] (F) (1) Notice of the filing of the petition for an emergency order shall be
given as required in the Maryland Rules and to the director.
(2) The notice shall be given in language reasonably understandable by the
intended recipients [at least 24 hours] AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE before the hearing for
emergency intervention.
(3) The court may waive the [24–hour] notice requirement on a showing
that:
(i) Immediate and reasonably foreseeable physical harm to the
person or others will result from the [24–hour] delay; and

HOUSE BILL 1553 11
(ii) Reasonable attempts have been made to give notice.
(4) Notice of the court’s final order shall be given to the same parties as
required under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
[(f)] (G) (1) The hearing on a petition for an emergency order for protective
services shall be held under the following conditions:
(i) 1. The person OR THE PERSON’S GUARDIAN, WHERE
APPLICABLE, shall be present unless the person OR THE PERSON’S GUARDIAN, WHERE
APPLICABLE, has knowingly and voluntarily waived the right to be present or cannot be
present because of physical or mental incapacity; and
2. Waiver or incapacity may not be presumed from
nonappearance but shall be determined on the basis of factual information supplied to the
court by counsel or a representative appointed by the court;
(ii) 1. The person has the right to counsel whether or not the
person is present at the hearing;
2. Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, if the person is
indigent or lacks the capacity to waive counsel, the court shall appoint counsel; and
3. If the person is indigent, the State shall pay reasonable
attorney’s fees; and
(iii) 1. The person may present evidence and cross–examine
witnesses; and
2. The hearing shall be held [no earlier than 24 hours] after
the notice required in subsection [(e)] (F) of this section has been given, unless such notice
has been waived by the court.
(2) In any action in which payment for the services of a court–appointed
attorney for the person is the responsibility of the local department of social services, unless
the court finds that it would not be in the best interests of the person, the court shall:
(i) Appoint an attorney who has contracted with the Department of
Human Services to provide those services, in accordance with the terms of the contract; and
(ii) In an action in which an attorney has previously been appointed,
strike the appearance of the attorney previously appointed and appoint the attorney who
is currently under contract with the Department of Human Services, in accordance with
the terms of the contract.

HOUSE BILL 1553
[(g)] (H) The court shall issue for the record a statement of its findings in support
of any order for emergency protective services.
[(h)] (I) The person, the [temporary] EMERGENCY guardian, or any interested
person may petition the court to have the emergency order set aside or modified at any
time, notwithstanding any prior findings by the court that the person is disabled.
[(i)] (J) (1) If protective services are rendered on the basis of an emergency
order, the [temporary] EMERGENCY guardian shall submit a report describing the
circumstances including the name, place, date, and nature of the services, and the use of
forcible entry, if any, to the court and the director.
(2) The report under this subsection shall become part of the court record.
[(j)] (K) The person or the guardian of the person may appeal any findings of a
court under subsection (b) of this section. Such appeal shall be handled on an expedited
basis by the appellate court.
13–709.1.
(A) ON PETITION BY AN INTERESTED PERSON, A COURT MAY ISSUE AN
ORDER AUTHORIZING THE PROVISION OF PROTECTIVE SERVICES ON A TEMPORARY
BASIS TO AN ADULT AFTER FINDING ON THE RECORD BASED ON A PREPONDERANCE
OF THE EVIDENCE THAT:
(1) FOR THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION, THE PERSON LACKS
CAPACITY UNDER THE STANDARDS ENUMERATED IN § 13–705(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) (I) AN EMERGENCY EXISTS, AS DEFINED IN § 13–101 OF THIS
TITLE; OR
(II) THE PERSON IS CURRENTLY UNDER A GUARDIANSHIP AND
IS BEING MEDICALLY OR PHYSICALLY NEGLECTED; AND
(3) UNLESS THE BASIS OF THE TEMPORARY PETITION IS THAT THE
PERSON IS BEING NEGLECTED BY THE CURRENT GUARDIAN OF THE PERSON, NO
PERSON AUTHORIZED BY LAW OR COURT ORDER TO GIVE CONSENT FOR THE PERSON
IS AVAILABLE TO CONSENT TO EMERGENCY SERVICES.
(B) A PETITION FILED BY AN INTERESTED PERSON UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE HEARD AND RULED ON WITHIN 7 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE FILING OF
THE PETITION.

HOUSE BILL 1553 13
(C) IN ISSUING A TEMPORARY ORDER, THE COURT SHALL ADHERE TO THE
FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS AND LIMITATIONS:
(1) ONLY THE PROTECTIVE SERVICES THAT ARE NECESSARY TO
REMOVE THE CONDITIONS CREATING THE EMERGENCY MAY BE ORDERED AND THE
COURT SHALL SPECIFICALLY DESIGNATE THE APPROVED SERVICES IN THE ORDER;
(2) PROTECTIVE SERVICES AUTHORIZED BY A TEMPORARY ORDER
MAY NOT INCLUDE HOSPITALIZATION OR A CHANGE OF RESIDENCE UNLESS THE
COURT SPECIFICALLY FINDS THE ACTION IS NECESSARY AND GIVES SPECIFIC
APPROVAL FOR THE ACTION IN THE ORDER;
(3) PROTECTIVE SERVICES MAY BE PROVIDED UNDER A TEMPORARY
ORDER ONLY UNTIL APPOINTMENT OF A GUARDIAN OF THE PERSON IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–705 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(4) THE ISSUANCE OF A TEMPORARY ORDER AND THE APPOINTMENT
OF A TEMPORARY GUARDIAN MAY NOT DEPRIVE THE PERSON OF ANY RIGHTS
EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT PROVIDED FOR IN THE ORDER OR APPOINTMENT;
(5) (I) TO IMPLEMENT A TEMPORARY ORDER, THE COURT MAY
AUTHORIZE FORCIBLE ENTRY OF THE PREMISES OF THE PERSON FOR THE PURPOSE
OF RENDERING PROTECTIVE SERVICES OR TRANSPORTING THE PERSON TO
ANOTHER LOCATION FOR THE PROVISION OF PROTECTIVE SERVICES ONLY AFTER A
SHOWING TO THE COURT THAT ATTEMPTS TO GAIN VOLUNTARY ACCESS TO THE
PREMISES HAVE FAILED AND FORCIBLE ENTRY IS NECESSARY; AND
(II) PERSONS MAKING AUTHORIZED FORCIBLE ENTRY UNDER
ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM SHALL BE ACCOMPANIED BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER,
THE DIRECTOR, OR THE DIRECTOR’S REPRESENTATIVE, AND, IF APPROPRIATE, A
REPRESENTATIVE OF THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH; AND
(6) AN ORDER APPOINTING A TEMPORARY GUARDIAN UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL INCLUDE AN ACCESS SCHEDULE FOR INDIVIDUALS RELATED TO THE
DISABLED PERSON BY BLOOD OR MARRIAGE TO ACCESS THE DISABLED PERSON,
UNLESS THE COURT DETERMINES THAT AN ACCESS SCHEDULE IS NOT IN THE BEST
INTERESTS OF THE DISABLED PERSON.
(D) THE PETITION FOR A TEMPORARY ORDER SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND INTEREST OF THE PETITIONER;

HOUSE BILL 1553
(2) THE NAME, AGE, AND ADDRESS OF THE PERSON IN NEED OF
PROTECTIVE SERVICES;
(3) IF APPLICABLE, THE NAME, AGE, AND ADDRESS OF THE PERSON’S
CURRENT GUARDIAN;
(4) THE NATURE OF THE PERSON’S DISABILITY, IF DETERMINABLE;
(5) THE PROPOSED PROTECTIVE SERVICES;
(6) THE PETITIONER’S REASONABLE BELIEF, TOGETHER WITH
SUPPORTIVE FACTS, AS TO THE EXISTENCE OF THE FACTS STATED IN SUBSECTION
(A)(1) THROUGH (3) OF THIS SECTION;
(7) IF APPLICABLE, FACTS SHOWING THE PETITIONER’S ATTEMPTS
TO OBTAIN THE PERSON’S CONSENT TO THE SERVICES AND THE OUTCOMES OF THE
ATTEMPTS; AND
(8) IF APPLICABLE, FACTS SHOWING THAT THE PERSON’S CURRENT
GUARDIAN IS MEDICALLY OR PHYSICALLY NEGLECTING THE PERSON.
(E) (1) NOTICE OF THE FILING OF THE PETITION FOR A TEMPORARY
ORDER SHALL BE GIVEN AS REQUIRED IN THE MARYLAND RULES AND TO THE
DIRECTOR.
(2) THE NOTICE SHALL BE GIVEN IN A LANGUAGE REASONABLY
UNDERSTANDABLE BY THE INTENDED RECIPIENTS AT LEAST 24 HOURS BEFORE THE
HEARING FOR TEMPORARY INTERVENTION.
(3) THE COURT MAY WAIVE THE 24–HOUR NOTICE REQUIREMENT ON
A SHOWING THAT:
(I) IMMEDIATE AND REASONABLY FORESEEABLE PHYSICAL
HARM TO THE PERSON OR OTHERS WILL RESULT FROM THE 24–HOUR DELAY; AND
(II) REASONABLE ATTEMPTS HAVE BEEN MADE TO GIVE
NOTICE.
(4) NOTICE OF THE COURT’S FINAL ORDER SHALL BE GIVEN TO THE
SAME PARTIES AS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(F) (1) THE HEARING ON A PETITION FOR A TEMPORARY ORDER FOR
PROTECTIVE SERVICES SHALL BE HELD UNDER THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS:

HOUSE BILL 1553 15
(I) 1. THE PERSON, OR THE PERSON’S GUARDIAN, IF
APPLICABLE, SHALL BE PRESENT UNLESS THE PERSON, OR THE PERSON’S
GUARDIAN, IF APPLICABLE, HAS KNOWINGLY AND VOLUNTARILY WAIVED THE RIGHT
TO BE PRESENT OR CANNOT BE PRESENT BECAUSE OF PHYSICAL OR MENTAL
INCAPACITY; AND
2. WAIVER OR INCAPACITY MAY NOT BE PRESUMED
FROM NONAPPEARANCE BUT SHALL BE DETERMINED ON THE BASIS OF FACTUAL
INFORMATION SUPPLIED TO THE COURT BY COUNSEL OR A REPRESENTATIVE
APPOINTED BY THE COURT;
(II) 1. THE PERSON HAS THE RIGHT TO COUNSEL WHETHER
OR NOT THE PERSON IS PRESENT AT THE HEARING;
2. SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF
THE PERSON IS INDIGENT OR LACKS THE CAPACITY TO WAIVE COUNSEL, THE COURT
SHALL APPOINT COUNSEL; AND
3. IF THE PERSON IS INDIGENT, THE STATE SHALL PAY
REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES; AND
(III) 1. THE PERSON, OR THE PERSON’S GUARDIAN, WHERE
APPLICABLE, MAY PRESENT EVIDENCE AND CROSS–EXAMINE WITNESSES; AND
2. THE HEARING SHALL BE HELD NOT EARLIER THAN 24
HOURS AFTER THE NOTICE REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION HAS
BEEN GIVEN, UNLESS SUCH NOTICE HAS BEEN WAIVED BY THE COURT.
(2) IN ANY ACTION IN WHICH PAYMENT FOR THE SERVICES OF A
COURT–APPOINTED ATTORNEY FOR THE PERSON IS THE RESPONSIBILITY OF THE
LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES, UNLESS THE COURT FINDS THAT IT
WOULD NOT BE IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE PERSON, THE COURT SHALL:
(I) APPOINT AN ATTORNEY WHO HAS CONTRACTED WITH THE
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES TO PROVIDE THOSE SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE TERMS OF THE CONTRACT; AND
(II) IN AN ACTION IN WHICH AN ATTORNEY HAS PREVIOUSLY
BEEN APPOINTED, STRIKE THE APPEARANCE OF THE ATTORNEY PREVIOUSLY
APPOINTED AND APPOINT THE ATTORNEY WHO IS CURRENTLY UNDER CONTRACT
WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS
OF THE CONTRACT.

HOUSE BILL 1553
(G) THE COURT SHALL ISSUE FOR THE RECORD A STATEMENT OF THE
COURT’S FINDINGS IN SUPPORT OF ANY ORDER FOR TEMPORARY PROTECTIVE
SERVICES.
(H) THE PERSON, THE TEMPORARY GUARDIAN, OR ANY INTERESTED
PERSON MAY PETITION THE COURT TO HAVE THE TEMPORARY ORDER SET ASIDE OR
MODIFIED AT ANY TIME, NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PRIOR FINDINGS BY THE COURT
THAT THE PERSON IS DISABLED.
(I) (1) IF PROTECTIVE SERVICES ARE RENDERED ON THE BASIS OF A
TEMPORARY ORDER, THE TEMPORARY GUARDIAN SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT
DESCRIBING THE CIRCUMSTANCES, INCLUDING THE NAME, PLACE, DATE, AND
NATURE OF THE SERVICES AND THE USE OF FORCIBLE ENTRY, IF ANY, TO THE COURT
AND THE DIRECTOR.
(2) THE REPORT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BECOME PART OF
THE COURT RECORD.
(J) (1) THE PERSON, OR THE GUARDIAN OF THE PERSON, MAY APPEAL
ANY FINDINGS OF A COURT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) AN APPEAL SHALL BE HANDLED ON AN EXPEDITED BASIS BY THE
APPELLATE COURT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.